Washington statutes.
RCW 27.24.020

Board of trustees—Composition—Terms.

(1) Unless a regional law library is created pursuant to RCW 27.24.062, every county with a population of three hundred thousand or more must have a board of law library trustees consisting of five members to be constituted as follows: The chair of the county legislative authority is an ex officio trustee, the judges of the superior court of the county shall choose two of their number to be trustees, and the members of the county bar association shall choose two members of the bar of the county to be trustees.

(2) Unless a regional law library is created pursuant to RCW 27.24.062, every county with a population of eight thousand or more but less than three hundred thousand must have a board of law library trustees consisting of five members to be constituted as follows: The chair of the county legislative authority is an ex officio trustee, the judges of the superior court of the county shall choose one of their number to be a trustee, and the members of the county bar association shall choose three members of the county to be trustees. If there is no county bar association, then the lawyers of the county shall choose three of their number to be trustees.

(3) If a county has a population of less than eight thousand, then the provisions contained in RCW 27.24.068 shall apply to the establishment and operation of the county law library.

(4) If a regional law library is created pursuant to RCW 27.24.062, then it shall be governed by one board of trustees. The board shall consist of the following representatives from each county: The judges of the superior court of the county shall choose one of their number to be a trustee, the county legislative authority shall choose one of their number to be a trustee, and the members of the county bar association shall choose one member of the bar of the county to be a trustee. If there is no county bar association, then the lawyers of the county shall choose one of their number to be a trustee.

(5) The term of office of a member of the board who is a judge is for as long as he or she continues to be a judge, and the term of a member who is from the bar is four years. Vacancies shall be filled as they occur and in the manner directed in this section. The office of trustee shall be without salary or other compensation. The board shall elect one of their number president and the librarian shall act as secretary, except that in counties with a population of eight thousand or more but less than three hundred thousand, the board shall elect one of their number to act as secretary if no librarian is appointed. Meetings shall be held at least once per year, and if more often, then at such times as may be prescribed by rule.

[ 2011 c 336 s 706; 2005 c 63 s 2; 1992 c 62 s 2; 1919 c 84 s 2; RRS s 8248.]